Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Congressional Districts

118B.100.
Division of Commonwealth into congressional districts.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky is divided into six (6) congressional districts as provided by KRS

118B.110

to

118B.160

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 7, effective December 20, 1991.

118B.110.
First Congressional District.

The First Congressional District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Adair KY

County: Allen KY

County: Anderson KY (part)

E101 – Alton (part)

210059501011001, 210059501011002, 210059501011003, 210059501011010, 210059501011018, 210059501012000, 210059501012001

Click to view

E103 – West Alton (part)

210059501012002, 210059501012003, 210059503001000, 210059503001001, 210059503001002, 210059503001003, 210059503001004, 210059503001005, 210059503001006, 210059503001007, 210059503001009, 210059503001032, 210059503001033, 210059503001034, 210059503001035

Click to view

F102 – Western

F103 – Rutherford (part)

210059504001058, 210059504001084, 210059504001086, 210059504002040, 210059504002041, 210059504002042, 210059504002043, 210059504002060, 210059504002061, 210059504002062, 210059504002063, 210059504002064, 210059504002065, 210059504002066, 210059504002067, 210059504002068, 210059504002069, 210059504002070, 210059504002071

Click to view

F104 – Birdie (part)

210059503001008, 210059503001010, 210059503001011, 210059503001012, 210059503001013, 210059503001014, 210059503001015, 210059503001016, 210059503001017, 210059503001018, 210059503001019, 210059503001020, 210059503001021, 210059503001022, 210059503001023, 210059503001024, 210059503001025, 210059503001026, 210059503001027, 210059503001028, 210059503001029, 210059503001030, 210059503001031, 210059503001036, 210059503001037, 210059503001038, 210059503001039, 210059503001040, 210059503001041, 210059503001042, 210059503001043, 210059503001044, 210059503001045, 210059503001046, 210059503001047, 210059503001048, 210059503001049, 210059503001050, 210059503001051, 210059503001052, 210059503001053, 210059503001054, 210059503001055, 210059503001056, 210059503001057, 210059503001058, 210059503001059, 210059503001060, 210059503001061, 210059503001066, 210059503001067, 210059503001068, 210059503001069

Click to view

County: Ballard KY

County: Boyle KY

County: Caldwell KY

County: Calloway KY

County: Carlisle KY

County: Casey KY

County: Christian KY

County: Clinton KY

County: Crittenden KY

County: Cumberland KY

County: Franklin KY

County: Fulton KY

County: Graves KY

County: Henderson KY

County: Hickman KY

County: Hopkins KY

County: Livingston KY

County: Logan KY (part)

A101 – New National Guard Armory

A104 – Stevenson Elementary Schl

A105 – Logan Co Crthouse (City)

B101 – Adairville Middle School

B102 – Adairville Fire Station

B103 – Legacy Center

B104 – Russellville Fire Station

C101 – Logan Co Crthouse (Cnty)

C102 – Olmstead Middle School

C103 – Old National Guard Armory

C104 – Greenridge Community Cntr

D101 – Lewisburg School

D102 – Lewisburg Fire Station

D103 – Chandlers Elementary

E101 – Masonic Lodge

E102 – Auburn School (part)

211419601002051, 211419601002052, 211419601002053, 211419601002054, 211419601002056, 211419601002057, 211419601002061, 211419601002062, 211419601002063, 211419601002064, 211419601002065, 211419601002071, 211419601002072, 211419601002073, 211419601002074, 211419601002087, 211419601002088, 211419601002090, 211419601002091, 211419601003013, 211419603001062, 211419603001066, 211419603001067, 211419603001070, 211419603001071, 211419603001072, 211419603001073, 211419603001074, 211419603001075, 211419603001076

Click to view

E103 – Auburn City Hall (part)

211419601003006, 211419601003007, 211419601003008, 211419601003009, 211419601003010, 211419601003011, 211419601003012, 211419601003014, 211419601003015, 211419601003020, 211419601003022, 211419601003023, 211419601003024, 211419601003025, 211419601003026, 211419601003027, 211419601003028, 211419601003029, 211419601003030, 211419601003031, 211419601003032, 211419601003033, 211419601003034, 211419601003036, 211419601003039

Click to view

F101 – New Natl Guard Armory

F102 – Logan County High School

F103 – Municipal Housing Comm.

County: Lyon KY

County: Marion KY

County: Marshall KY

County: McCracken KY

County: Metcalfe KY

County: Monroe KY

County: Russell KY

County: Simpson KY

County: Taylor KY

County: Todd KY

County: Trigg KY

County: Union KY

County: Washington KY

County: Webster KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 1, effective December 20, 1991; 1994, ch. 497, § 4, effective November 9, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 139, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2012, ch. 3, § 1, effective February 10, 2012; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 8, § 1, effective January 20, 2022.

118B.120.
Second Congressional District.

The Second Congressional District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Barren KY

County: Breckinridge KY

County: Bullitt KY

County: Butler KY

County: Daviess KY

County: Edmonson KY

County: Grayson KY

County: Green KY

County: Hancock KY

County: Hardin KY

County: Hart KY

County: Jefferson KY (part)

B153 – Precinct 153 29 District

B158 – Precinct 158 29 District

B159 – Precinct 159 29 District (part)

211110116033001

Click to view

B161 – Precinct 161 29 District

B162 – Precinct 162 29 District (part)

211110116031011, 211110116031012, 211110116031013, 211110116031014, 211110116031015, 211110116032005, 211110116032006, 211110116032010, 211110116032011, 211110116032012, 211110116032013, 211110116032014, 211110116032015, 211110116032016, 211110116032017, 211110116032018, 211110116032041, 211110116032054, 211110117083004, 211110117083009

Click to view

B175 – Precinct 175 29 District (part)

211110117083001

Click to view

B177 – Precinct 177 29 District

V102 – Precinct 102 36 District (part)

211110115202012, 211110116041016, 211110116041017, 211110116041018

Click to view

V103 – Precinct 103 36 District

V104 – Precinct 104 36 District

V105 – Precinct 105 36 District (part)

211110116041008, 211110116041009, 211110116041010, 211110116041011, 211110116041012, 211110116041013, 211110116041014, 211110116041015, 211110116041029, 211110116041031, 211110116041032, 211110116041033, 211110116041034, 211110116041037, 211110116041038, 211110116041039, 211110116041040, 211110116041041, 211110116041043, 211110116041044, 211110116041045, 211110116042000, 211110116042001, 211110116042002, 211110116042003, 211110116042004, 211110116042005, 211110116042006, 211110116042007, 211110116042011, 211110116061028, 211110116061029, 211110116061030, 211110116061031, 211110116061034, 211110116061035, 211110116061039

Click to view

V107 – Precinct 107 36 District

V108 – Precinct 108 36 District

V110 – Precinct 110 36 District

V111 – Precinct 111 36 District

V112 – Precinct 112 36 District

V113 – Precinct 113 36 District (part)

211110116051000, 211110116051001, 211110116051002, 211110116051003, 211110116051004, 211110116051005, 211110116051006, 211110116051007, 211110116051008, 211110116051009, 211110116051010, 211110116052009, 211110116052012, 211110116052013, 211110116061008, 211110116061009, 211110116061010, 211110116061011, 211110116061012, 211110116061013, 211110116061014, 211110116061015, 211110116061016, 211110116061017, 211110116061018, 211110116061019, 211110116061036, 211110116061037, 211110116061038, 211110116061040

Click to view

V114 – Precinct 114 36 District

V119 – Precinct 119 36 District (part)

211110116061021, 211110116061022, 211110116061023, 211110116061024, 211110116061026, 211110116061033

Click to view

V121 – Precinct 121 36 District

V124 – Precinct 124 36 District (part)

211110103162006, 211110103162007

Click to view

V125 – Precinct 125 36 District

V127 – Precinct 127 36 District (part)

211110103161007, 211110103161008, 211110103161009, 211110103161016, 211110103161017, 211110103161018, 211110103161019, 211110103162001, 211110103162002, 211110103162008, 211110103162009, 211110103162010, 211110103162011, 211110103162013, 211110103162014, 211110103162015, 211110103162016, 211110103162017, 211110103163004, 211110103163005, 211110103163010, 211110103163011, 211110103163012, 211110103163013, 211110103163016

Click to view

V129 – Precinct 129 36 District

V131 – Precinct 131 36 District

County: Larue KY

County: Logan KY (part)

E102-Auburn School (part)

211419601001008, 211419601001009, 211419601001010, 211419601001011, 211419601001012, 211419601001013, 211419601001014, 211419601001015, 211419601001016, 211419601001017, 211419601001018, 211419601001019, 211419601001020, 211419601001021, 211419601001022, 211419601001023, 211419601001024, 211419601001025, 211419601001026, 211419601001027, 211419601001028, 211419601001029, 211419601001030, 211419601001031, 211419601001032, 211419601001033, 211419601001034, 211419601001035, 211419601001036, 211419601001037, 211419601001038, 211419601001039, 211419601001045, 211419601001049, 211419601001050, 211419601001051, 211419601001052, 211419601001053, 211419601001054, 211419601001055, 211419601001056, 211419601001057, 211419601001058, 211419601001059, 211419601001060, 211419601001061, 211419601001062, 211419601001063, 211419601001064, 211419601001065, 211419601001066, 211419601001067, 211419601001068, 211419601001069, 211419601001070, 211419601001071, 211419601001072, 211419601001073, 211419601001074, 211419601001075, 211419601001076, 211419601001077, 211419601001087, 211419601001088, 211419601001090, 211419601001091, 211419601001092, 211419601001093, 211419601001094, 211419601001095, 211419601001096, 211419601001097, 211419601001098, 211419601001099, 211419601001100, 211419601001101, 211419601001102, 211419601001103, 211419601001104, 211419601001105, 211419601001106, 211419601001107, 211419601001108, 211419601001109, 211419601001110, 211419601001112, 211419601001113, 211419601001114, 211419601001116, 211419601002055, 211419601002059, 211419601002060, 211419601002066, 211419601002067, 211419601002068, 211419601002069, 211419601002070, 211419601002075, 211419601002076, 211419601002077, 211419601002078, 211419601002079, 211419601002080, 211419601002081, 211419601002082, 211419601002083, 211419601002084, 211419601002085, 211419601002086, 211419601002089, 211419601002093

Click to view

E103 – Auburn City Hall (part)

211419601001078, 211419601001079, 211419601001080, 211419601001081, 211419601001082, 211419601001083, 211419601001084, 211419601001085, 211419601001086, 211419601001089, 211419601001115, 211419601003000, 211419601003001, 211419601003002, 211419601003003, 211419601003004, 211419601003005, 211419601003016, 211419601003017, 211419601003037, 211419601003038

Click to view

County: McLean KY

County: Meade KY

County: Muhlenberg KY

County: Nelson KY (part)

A101 – A1

A102 – A2

A103 – A3

A104 – A4

A105 – A5 (part)

211799304001035, 211799304001036, 211799304001037, 211799304001038, 211799304001039, 211799304001040, 211799304001041, 211799304001042, 211799304002024, 211799304002025, 211799304002026, 211799304002027, 211799304002028, 211799304002029, 211799304002030, 211799304002031, 211799304002032, 211799304002054, 211799305001008, 211799305001009, 211799305001010, 211799305001011, 211799305001012, 211799305001013, 211799305001014, 211799305001015, 211799305001016, 211799305001017, 211799305001018, 211799305001019, 211799305001020, 211799305001021, 211799305001022, 211799305001023, 211799305001024, 211799305001025, 211799305001026, 211799305001027, 211799305001028, 211799305001029, 211799305001030, 211799305001031, 211799305001032, 211799305001033, 211799305001034, 211799305001035, 211799305001036

Click to view

B102 – B2

B103 – B3 (part)

211799304001000, 211799304001001, 211799304001002, 211799304001003, 211799304001005, 211799304001008, 211799304001021, 211799304001022, 211799304001023, 211799304001024, 211799304001025, 211799304001026, 211799304001027, 211799304001028, 211799304001029, 211799304001033, 211799304001034, 211799305001000, 211799305003026, 211799305003027

Click to view

C101 – C1

C102 – C2

C103 – C3

C104 – C4

C105 – C5

D101 – D1

D105 – D5 (part)

211799302011008, 211799302011016, 211799302011020, 211799303011002, 211799303011003, 211799303011004, 211799303011008, 211799303011021, 211799303011058, 211799303011059, 211799303011060

Click to view

E105 – E5 (part)

211799303044007

Click to view

County: Ohio KY

County: Warren KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 2, effective December 20, 1991; 1994, ch. 497, § 5, effective November 9, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 140, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2012, ch. 3, § 2, effective February 10, 2012; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 8, § 2, effective January 20, 2022.

118B.130.
Third Congressional District.

The Third Congressional District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

A105 – Precinct 105 28 District

A107 – Precinct 107 28 District

A108 – Precinct 108 28 District

A111 – Precinct 111 28 District

A113 – Precinct 113 28 District

A114 – Precinct 114 28 District

A115 – Precinct 115 28 District

A118 – Precinct 118 28 District

A119 – Precinct 119 28 District

A121 – Precinct 121 28 District

A123 – Precinct 123 28 District

A124 – Precinct 124 28 District

A125 – Precinct 125 28 District

A126 – Precinct 126 28 District

A127 – Precinct 127 28 District

A128 – Precinct 128 28 District

A129 – Precinct 129 28 District

A130 – Precinct 130 28 District

A131 – Precinct 131 28 District

A134 – Precinct 134 28 District

A135 – Precinct 135 28 District

A136 – Precinct 136 28 District

A139 – Precinct 139 28 District

A140 – Precinct 140 28 District

A141 – Precinct 141 28 District

A142 – Precinct 142 28 District

A143 – Precinct 143 28 District

B124 – Precinct 124 29 District

B132 – Precinct 132 29 District

B133 – Precinct 133 29 District

B134 – Precinct 134 29 District

B149 – Precinct 149 29 District

B151 – Precinct 151 29 District

B154 – Precinct 154 29 District

B155 – Precinct 155 29 District

B156 – Precinct 156 29 District

B157 – Precinct 157 29 District

B159 – Precinct 159 29 District (part)

211110115192000, 211110115192001, 211110115192002, 211110115192003, 211110115192004, 211110115192005, 211110115192006, 211110115192007, 211110115192008, 211110115192009, 211110116033000, 211110116033002, 211110116033003, 211110116033004, 211110116033005, 211110116033006

Click to view

B160-Precinct 160 29 District

B162-Precinct 162 29 District (part)

211110117093000, 211110117093011

Click to view

B163 – Precinct 163 29 District

B166 – Precinct 166 29 District

B168 – Precinct 168 29 District

B169 – Precinct 169 29 District

B170 – Precinct 170 29 District

B172 – Precinct 172 29 District

B173 – Precinct 173 29 District

B175 – Precinct 175 29 District (part)

211110117083000, 211110117083002, 211110117083003, 211110117083005, 211110117083006, 211110117083007, 211110117083008, 211110117083010, 211110117084000, 211110117084001, 211110117084012, 211110117084013

Click to view

B181 – Precinct 181 29 District

B182 – Precinct 182 29 District

B183 – Precinct 183 29 District

B184 – Precinct 184 29 District

B185 – Precinct 185 29 District

C101 – Precinct 101 30 District

C102 – Precinct 102 30 District

C103 – Precinct 103 30 District

C104 – Precinct 104 30 District

C105 – Precinct 105 30 District

C106 – Precinct 106 30 District

C108 – Precinct 108 30 District

C109 – Precinct 109 30 District

C110 – Precinct 110 30 District

C111 – Precinct 111 30 District

C113 – Precinct 113 30 District

C115 – Precinct 115 30 District

C122 – Precinct 122 30 District

C123 – Precinct 123 30 District

C124 – Precinct 124 30 District

C125 – Precinct 125 30 District

C126 – Precinct 126 30 District

C128 – Precinct 128 30 District

C129 – Precinct 129 30 District

C130 – Precinct 130 30 District

C131 – Precinct 131 30 District

C133 – Precinct 133 30 District

C134 – Precinct 134 30 District

C135 – Precinct 135 30 District

C136 – Precinct 136 30 District

C137 – Precinct 137 30 District

C138 – Precinct 138 30 District

C139 – Precinct 139 30 District

C141 – Precinct 141 30 District

C142 – Precinct 142 30 District

C143 – Precinct 143 30 District

C144 – Precinct 144 30 District

C145 – Precinct 145 30 District

C146 – Precinct 146 30 District

C147 – Precinct 147 30 District

C148 – Precinct 148 30 District

C149 – Precinct 149 30 District

C150 – Precinct 150 30 District

C151 – Precinct 151 30 District

D101 – Precinct 101 31 District

D104 – Precinct 104 31 District

D106 – Precinct 106 31 District

D108 – Precinct 108 31 District

D109 – Precinct 109 31 District

D110 – Precinct 110 31 District

D113 – Precinct 113 31 District

D114 – Precinct 114 31 District

D115 – Precinct 115 31 District

D116 – Precinct 116 31 District

D117 – Precinct 117 31 District

D120 – Precinct 120 31 District

D121 – Precinct 121 31 District

D122 – Precinct 122 31 District

D126 – Precinct 126 31 District

D129 – Precinct 129 31 District

D130 – Precinct 130 31 District

D131 – Precinct 131 31 District

D132 – Precinct 132 31 District

D135 – Precinct 135 31 District

D136 – Precinct 136 31 District

D137 – Precinct 137 31 District

D138 – Precinct 138 31 District

D139 – Precinct 139 31 District

D140 – Precinct 140 31 District

D141 – Precinct 141 31 District

D142 – Precinct 142 31 District

D144 – Precinct 144 31 District

D145 – Precinct 145 31 District

E139 – Precinct 139 32 District

E141 – Precinct 141 32 District

E142 – Precinct 142 32 District

E143 – Precinct 143 32 District

E144 – Precinct 144 32 District

E145 – Precinct 145 32 District

E148 – Precinct 148 32 District

E152 – Precinct 152 32 District

E154 – Precinct 154 32 District

E155 – Precinct 155 32 District

E157 – Precinct 157 32 District

E158 – Precinct 158 32 District

E159 – Precinct 159 32 District

E160 – Precinct 160 32 District

E161 – Precinct 161 32 District

E162 – Precinct 162 32 District

E163 – Precinct 163 32 District

E164 – Precinct 164 32 District

E165 – Precinct 165 32 District

E166 – Precinct 166 32 District

E167 – Precinct 167 32 District

E168 – Precinct 168 32 District

E169 – Precinct 169 32 District

E171 – Precinct 171 32 District

E173 – Precinct 173 32 District

E175 – Precinct 175 32 District

E176 – Precinct 176 32 District

E177 – Precinct 177 32 District

E178 – Precinct 178 32 District

E179 – Precinct 179 32 District

E180 – Precinct 180 32 District

E181 – Precinct 181 32 District

E182 – Precinct 182 32 District

E183 – Precinct 183 32 District

E184 – Precinct 184 32 District

E185 – Precinct 185 32 District

F106 – Precinct 106 33 District

F145 – Precinct 145 33 District

F151 – Precinct 151 33 District

F152 – Precinct 152 33 District

F153 – Precinct 153 33 District

F154 – Precinct 154 33 District

F155 – Precinct 155 33 District

F156 – Precinct 156 33 District

F158 – Precinct 158 33 District

F161 – Precinct 161 33 District

F163 – Precinct 163 33 District

F164 – Precinct 164 33 District

F166 – Precinct 166 33 District

F167 – Precinct 167 33 District

F169 – Precinct 169 33 District

F170 – Precinct 170 33 District

F171 – Precinct 171 33 District

F172 – Precinct 172 33 District

F176 – Precinct 176 33 District

F179 – Precinct 179 33 District

F180 – Precinct 180 33 District

F181 – Precinct 181 33 District

F182 – Precinct 182 33 District

F183 – Precinct 183 33 District

F184 – Precinct 184 33 District

F185 – Precinct 185 33 District

F186 – Precinct 186 33 District

F187 – Precinct 187 33 District

G103 – Precinct 103 34 District

G104 – Precinct 104 34 District

G106 – Precinct 106 34 District

G107 – Precinct 107 34 District

G108 – Precinct 108 34 District

G109 – Precinct 109 34 District

G111 – Precinct 111 34 District

G112 – Precinct 112 34 District

G116 – Precinct 116 34 District

G117 – Precinct 117 34 District

G119 – Precinct 119 34 District

G120 – Precinct 120 34 District

G121 – Precinct 121 34 District

G122 – Precinct 122 34 District

G123 – Precinct 123 34 District

G124 – Precinct 124 34 District

G126 – Precinct 126 34 District

G129 – Precinct 129 34 District

G140 – Precinct 140 34 District

G141 – Precinct 141 34 District

G142 – Precinct 142 34 District

G143 – Precinct 143 34 District

G144 – Precinct 144 34 District

G145 – Precinct 145 34 District

G146 – Precinct 146 34 District

G147 – Precinct 147 34 District

G148 – Precinct 148 34 District

G149 – Precinct 149 34 District

G150 – Precinct 150 34 District

G151 – Precinct 151 34 District

G154 – Precinct 154 34 District

G155 – Precinct 155 34 District

G156 – Precinct 156 34 District

G157 – Precinct 157 34 District

G158 – Precinct 158 34 District

G159 – Precinct 159 34 District

G160 – Precinct 160 34 District

G161 – Precinct 161 34 District

G162 – Precinct 162 34 District

G163 – Precinct 163 34 District

G164 – Precinct 164 34 District

G165 – Precinct 165 34 District

G166 – Precinct 166 34 District

G167 – Precinct 167 34 District

G168 – Precinct 168 34 District

G169 – Precinct 169 34 District

H102 – Precinct 102 35 District

H103 – Precinct 103 35 District

H105 – Precinct 105 35 District

H106 – Precinct 106 35 District

H109 – Precinct 109 35 District

H110 – Precinct 110 35 District

H111 – Precinct 111 35 District

H112 – Precinct 112 35 District

H113 – Precinct 113 35 District

H114 – Precinct 114 35 District

H115 – Precinct 115 35 District

H116 – Precinct 116 35 District

H117 – Precinct 117 35 District

H118 – Precinct 118 35 District

H120 – Precinct 120 35 District

H121 – Precinct 121 35 District

H123 – Precinct 123 35 District

H124 – Precinct 124 35 District

H125 – Precinct 125 35 District

H126 – Precinct 126 35 District

H127 – Precinct 127 35 District

H130 – Precinct 130 35 District

H131 – Precinct 131 35 District

H132 – Precinct 132 35 District

H133 – Precinct 133 35 District

H138 – Precinct 138 35 District

H141 – Precinct 141 35 District

H144 – Precinct 144 35 District

H145 – Precinct 145 35 District

H146 – Precinct 146 35 District

H147 – Precinct 147 35 District

H148 – Precinct 148 35 District

H150 – Precinct 150 35 District

H151 – Precinct 151 35 District

H152 – Precinct 152 35 District

H153 – Precinct 153 35 District

H154 – Precinct 154 35 District

H155 – Precinct 155 35 District

H156 – Precinct 156 35 District

H157 – Precinct 157 35 District

H158 – Precinct 158 35 District

H159 – Precinct 159 35 District

H160 – Precinct 160 35 District

H161 – Precinct 161 35 District

H162 – Precinct 162 35 District

I107 – Precinct 107 37 District

I109 – Precinct 109 37 District

I110 – Precinct 110 37 District

I111 – Precinct 111 37 District

I112 – Precinct 112 37 District

I115 – Precinct 115 37 District

I120 – Precinct 120 37 District

I122 – Precinct 122 37 District

I123 – Precinct 123 37 District

I124 – Precinct 124 37 District

I125 – Precinct 125 37 District

I126 – Precinct 126 37 District

I130 – Precinct 130 37 District

I133 – Precinct 133 37 District

I135 – Precinct 135 37 District

I138 – Precinct 138 37 District

I140 – Precinct 140 37 District

I141 – Precinct 141 37 District

I142 – Precinct 142 37 District

I143 – Precinct 143 37 District

I144 – Precinct 144 37 District

I145 – Precinct 145 37 District

I146 – Precinct 146 37 District

I147 – Precinct 147 37 District

I148 – Precinct 148 37 District

I149 – Precinct 149 37 District

I150 – Precinct 150 37 District

I151 – Precinct 151 37 District

I152 – Precinct 152 37 District

I153 – Precinct 153 37 District

I154 – Precinct 154 37 District

I155 – Precinct 155 37 District

I156 – Precinct 156 37 District

J101 – Precinct 101 38 District

J104 – Precinct 104 38 District

J105 – Precinct 105 38 District

J107 – Precinct 107 38 District

J108 – Precinct 108 38 District

J111 – Precinct 111 38 District

J113 – Precinct 113 38 District

J114 – Precinct 114 38 District

J117 – Precinct 117 38 District

J119 – Precinct 119 38 District

J120 – Precinct 120 38 District

J122 – Precinct 122 38 District

J123 – Precinct 123 38 District

J130 – Precinct 130 38 District

J135 – Precinct 135 38 District

J137 – Precinct 137 38 District

J138 – Precinct 138 38 District

J140 – Precinct 140 38 District

J141 – Precinct 141 38 District

J142 – Precinct 142 38 District

J143 – Precinct 143 38 District

J144 – Precinct 144 38 District

J145 – Precinct 145 38 District

J146 – Precinct 146 38 District

J147 – Precinct 147 38 District

J148 – Precinct 148 38 District

J149 – Precinct 149 38 District

J150 – Precinct 150 38 District

J151 – Precinct 151 38 District

J152 – Precinct 152 38 District

J153 – Precinct 153 38 District

J154 – Precinct 154 38 District

J155 – Precinct 155 38 District

K104 – Precinct 104 40 District

K105 – Precinct 105 40 District

K110 – Precinct 110 40 District

K111 – Precinct 111 40 District

K112 – Precinct 112 40 District

K113 – Precinct 113 40 District

K114 – Precinct 114 40 District

K116 – Precinct 116 40 District

K117 – Precinct 117 40 District

K118 – Precinct 118 40 District

K119 – Precinct 119 40 District

K122 – Precinct 122 40 District

K123 – Precinct 123 40 District

K125 – Precinct 125 40 District

K126 – Precinct 126 40 District

K127 – Precinct 127 40 District

K128 – Precinct 128 40 District

K129 – Precinct 129 40 District

K130 – Precinct 130 40 District

K131 – Precinct 131 40 District

K132 – Precinct 132 40 District

K133 – Precinct 133 40 District

K134 – Precinct 134 40 District

K135 – Precinct 135 40 District

K136 – Precinct 136 40 District

K137 – Precinct 137 40 District

K138 – Precinct 138 40 District

K139 – Precinct 139 40 District

K140 – Precinct 140 40 District

K141 – Precinct 141 40 District

K142 – Precinct 142 40 District

K143 – Precinct 143 40 District

K144 – Precinct 144 40 District

K145 – Precinct 145 40 District

K146 – Precinct 146 40 District

K147 – Precinct 147 40 District

K148 – Precinct 148 40 District

K149 – Precinct 149 40 District

K150 – Precinct 150 40 District

K151 – Precinct 151 40 District

L104 – Precinct 104 41 District

L108 – Precinct 108 41 District

L110 – Precinct 110 41 District

L111 – Precinct 111 41 District

L112 – Precinct 112 41 District

L113 – Precinct 113 41 District

L115 – Precinct 115 41 District

L117 – Precinct 117 41 District

L118 – Precinct 118 41 District

L119 – Precinct 119 41 District

L134 – Precinct 134 41 District

L135 – Precinct 135 41 District

L136 – Precinct 136 41 District

L138 – Precinct 138 41 District

L139 – Precinct 139 41 District

L140 – Precinct 140 41 District

L141 – Precinct 141 41 District

L142 – Precinct 142 41 District

L143 – Precinct 143 41 District

L144 – Precinct 144 41 District

L145 – Precinct 145 41 District

L146 – Precinct 146 41 District

L147 – Precinct 147 41 District

L148 – Precinct 148 41 District

L149 – Precinct 149 41 District

L150 – Precinct 150 41 District

L151 – Precinct 151 41 District

L152 – Precinct 152 41 District

L153 – Precinct 153 41 District

L154 – Precinct 154 41 District

L155 – Precinct 155 41 District

L156 – Precinct 156 41 District

L157 – Precinct 157 41 District

L158 – Precinct 158 41 District

L159 – Precinct 159 41 District

L160 – Precinct 160 41 District

L161 – Precinct 161 41 District

L162 – Precinct 162 41 District

L163 – Precinct 163 41 District

L164 – Precinct 164 41 District

M102 – Precinct 102 42 District

M103 – Precinct 103 42 District

M104 – Precinct 104 42 District

M105 – Precinct 105 42 District

M107 – Precinct 107 42 District

M110 – Precinct 110 42 District

M121 – Precinct 121 42 District

M123 – Precinct 123 42 District

M124 – Precinct 124 42 District

M129 – Precinct 129 42 District

M130 – Precinct 130 42 District

M131 – Precinct 131 42 District

M133 – Precinct 133 42 District

M137 – Precinct 137 42 District

M138 – Precinct 138 42 District

M139 – Precinct 139 42 District

M140 – Precinct 140 42 District

M141 – Precinct 141 42 District

M142 – Precinct 142 42 District

M143 – Precinct 143 42 District

M144 – Precinct 144 42 District

M145 – Precinct 145 42 District

M146 – Precinct 146 42 District

M147 – Precinct 147 42 District

M148 – Precinct 148 42 District

M149 – Precinct 149 42 District

M150 – Precinct 150 42 District

M159 – Precinct 159 42 District

M160 – Precinct 160 42 District

M162 – Precinct 162 42 District

M163 – Precinct 163 42 District

M164 – Precinct 164 42 District

M165 – Precinct 165 42 District

M166 – Precinct 166 42 District

M167 – Precinct 167 42 District

M168 – Precinct 168 42 District

M169 – Precinct 169 42 District

M170 – Precinct 170 42 District

M171 – Precinct 171 42 District

M172 – Precinct 172 42 District

M173 – Precinct 173 42 District

M174 – Precinct 174 42 District

M175 – Precinct 175 42 District

N101 – Precinct 101 43 District

N102 – Precinct 102 43 District

N103 – Precinct 103 43 District

N104 – Precinct 104 43 District

N105 – Precinct 105 43 District

N106 – Precinct 106 43 District

N107 – Precinct 107 43 District

N108 – Precinct 108 43 District

N109 – Precinct 109 43 District

N110 – Precinct 110 43 District

N111 – Precinct 111 43 District

N112 – Precinct 112 43 District

N113 – Precinct 113 43 District

N115 – Precinct 115 43 District

N117 – Precinct 117 43 District

N124 – Precinct 124 43 District

N125 – Precinct 125 43 District

N126 – Precinct 126 43 District

N127 – Precinct 127 43 District

N128 – Precinct 128 43 District

N130 – Precinct 130 43 District

N131 – Precinct 131 43 District

N134 – Precinct 134 43 District

N135 – Precinct 135 43 District

N136 – Precinct 136 43 District

N137 – Precinct 137 43 District

N138 – Precinct 138 43 District

N139 – Precinct 139 43 District

N141 – Precinct 141 43 District

N142 – Precinct 142 43 District

N143 – Precinct 143 43 District

N144 – Precinct 144 43 District

N145 – Precinct 145 43 District

N146 – Precinct 146 43 District

N147 – Precinct 147 43 District

N148 – Precinct 148 43 District

N149 – Precinct 149 43 District

N150 – Precinct 150 43 District

O105 – Precinct 105 44 District

O107 – Precinct 107 44 District

O109 – Precinct 109 44 District

O111 – Precinct 111 44 District

O112 – Precinct 112 44 District

O113 – Precinct 113 44 District

O114 – Precinct 114 44 District

O115 – Precinct 115 44 District

O117 – Precinct 117 44 District

O119 – Precinct 119 44 District

O121 – Precinct 121 44 District

O123 – Precinct 123 44 District

O124 – Precinct 124 44 District

O126 – Precinct 126 44 District

O127 – Precinct 127 44 District

O128 – Precinct 128 44 District

O129 – Precinct 129 44 District

O130 – Precinct 130 44 District

O131 – Precinct 131 44 District

O133 – Precinct 133 44 District

O134 – Precinct 134 44 District

O135 – Precinct 135 44 District

O136 – Precinct 136 44 District

O137 – Precinct 137 44 District

O138 – Precinct 138 44 District

O139 – Precinct 139 44 District

O141 – Precinct 141 44 District

O142 – Precinct 142 44 District

O143 – Precinct 143 44 District

Q101 – Precinct 101 46 District

Q103 – Precinct 103 46 District

Q104 – Precinct 104 46 District

Q105 – Precinct 105 46 District

Q107 – Precinct 107 46 District

Q109 – Precinct 109 46 District

Q112 – Precinct 112 46 District

Q113 – Precinct 113 46 District

Q114 – Precinct 114 46 District

Q115 – Precinct 115 46 District

Q116 – Precinct 116 46 District

Q117 – Precinct 117 46 District

Q119 – Precinct 119 46 District

Q122 – Precinct 122 46 District

Q123 – Precinct 123 46 District

Q124 – Precinct 124 46 District

Q125 – Precinct 125 46 District

Q126 – Precinct 126 46 District

Q127 – Precinct 127 46 District

Q131 – Precinct 131 46 District

Q132 – Precinct 132 46 District

Q134 – Precinct 134 46 District

Q136 – Precinct 136 46 District

Q137 – Precinct 137 46 District

Q138 – Precinct 138 46 District

Q139 – Precinct 139 46 District

S116 – Precinct 116 48 District

S118 – Precinct 118 48 District

S119 – Precinct 119 48 District

S125 – Precinct 125 48 District

S126 – Precinct 126 48 District

S128 – Precinct 128 48 District

S129 – Precinct 129 48 District

S130 – Precinct 130 48 District

S131 – Precinct 131 48 District

S132 – Precinct 132 48 District

S135 – Precinct 135 48 District

S139 – Precinct 139 48 District

S140 – Precinct 140 48 District

S141 – Precinct 141 48 District

S142 – Precinct 142 48 District

S143 – Precinct 143 48 District

S144 – Precinct 144 48 District

S146 – Precinct 146 48 District

S150 – Precinct 150 48 District

S152 – Precinct 152 48 District

S153 – Precinct 153 48 District

S156 – Precinct 156 48 District

S160 – Precinct 160 48 District

S161 – Precinct 161 48 District

S164 – Precinct 164 48 District

S165 – Precinct 165 48 District

S166 – Precinct 166 48 District

S167 – Precinct 167 48 District

S168 – Precinct 168 48 District

V101 – Precinct 101 36 District

V102 – Precinct 102 36 District (part)

211110115202004, 211110115202005, 211110115202006, 211110115202007, 211110115202009, 211110115202011, 211110115203000, 211110115203001, 211110115203002, 211110115203003, 211110115203004, 211110115203005, 211110115203006, 211110115203007, 211110115203008, 211110115203009

Click to view

V105 – Precinct 105 36 District (part)

211110111162000, 211110111162001, 211110111162002, 211110111162014, 211110111162015, 211110115202000

Click to view

V106 – Precinct 106 36 District

V109 – Precinct 109 36 District

V113 – Precinct 113 36 District (part)

211110116053000, 211110116053002, 211110116053003, 211110116053004, 211110116053008, 211110116053009, 211110116053010, 211110116053011, 211110116053012, 211110116053013, 211110116053014, 211110116053015, 211110116053016, 211110116053017, 211110116053018, 211110116053019, 211110116053020, 211110116053021, 211110116053022, 211110116053023, 211110116053024, 211110116053025, 211110116053026, 211110116053027, 211110116053028, 211110116053029, 211110116053030, 211110116053031, 211110116053032, 211110116053033, 211110116053034, 211110116053035, 211110116053037

Click to view

V115 – Precinct 115 36 District

V116 – Precinct 116 36 District

V117 – Precinct 117 36 District

V118 – Precinct 118 36 District

V119 – Precinct 119 36 District (part)

211110104071001, 211110104071005, 211110104071006, 211110104071007, 211110104071008, 211110104071013, 211110104071014, 211110104071015, 211110104071016, 211110104071017, 211110104071018, 211110104071019, 211110104071020, 211110104071021, 211110104071022, 211110104071023, 211110104071024, 211110104071025, 211110104071026, 211110104071027, 211110104071028, 211110104072029, 211110107062005, 211110111163003, 211110111163004, 211110111163005, 211110111163006, 211110111163007, 211110111163008, 211110111163009, 211110111163010, 211110111163011, 211110111163012, 211110111163013, 211110111163014, 211110111163015, 211110111163016, 211110111163017, 211110111163018, 211110111163019, 211110111163020, 211110111163021, 211110111163022, 211110111163023, 211110111163024, 211110111163025, 211110111163026, 211110111163027, 211110111163028, 211110111163029, 211110111163030, 211110111163031, 211110111163032, 211110111163033, 211110111163036, 211110111163037, 211110111163039, 211110111163040, 211110111163041, 211110111163042, 211110111163043, 211110111163044, 211110111163045, 211110111163046, 211110111163047, 211110111163048, 211110111163049, 211110111163050, 211110111163051

Click to view

V120 – Precinct 120 36 District

V122 – Precinct 122 36 District

V123 – Precinct 123 36 District

V124 – Precinct 124 36 District (part)

211110103162003, 211110103162004, 211110103162005, 211110103162018, 211110104064003, 211110104064004, 211110104064005, 211110104064006, 211110104064007, 211110104064009, 211110104064010, 211110104064011, 211110104064012, 211110104064013, 211110104064014, 211110104064018, 211110104064022, 211110104064023, 211110104064024, 211110104064025, 211110104064026, 211110104064027, 211110104064028

Click to view

V126 – Precinct 126 36 District

V127 – Precinct 127 36 District (part)

211110103152000, 211110103152001, 211110103152002, 211110103152003, 211110103152004, 211110103152005, 211110103152006, 211110103152007, 211110103152008, 211110103152009, 211110103152010, 211110103152011, 211110103163019, 211110104063000, 211110104063001, 211110104063002, 211110104063003, 211110104063004, 211110104063005, 211110104063006, 211110104063007, 211110104063008, 211110104063015, 211110104063016, 211110104064000, 211110104064001, 211110104064002

Click to view

V128 – Precinct 128 36 District

V130 – Precinct 130 36 District

V132 – Precinct 132 36 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 3, effective December 20, 1991; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 141, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2012, ch. 3, § 3, effective February 10, 2012; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 8, § 3, effective January 20, 2022.